Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 6. Trust Assets.

Sec. 06.26.370.
Deposits of trust assets.

A trust company may deposit trust money or other trust assets with itself as an investment if the settlor or the beneficiary authorizes the deposit and if

the trust company maintains as security for the deposits a separate fund of securities that may be used for trust investments and that are under the control of a federal reserve bank or a clearing corporation in this state or elsewhere; in this paragraph, “clearing corporation” has the meaning given in AS

45.08.102

;

the total market value of the security fund maintained under (1) of this subsection is at all times at least equal to the deposit;

the security fund maintained under (1) of this subsection is expressly designated as a security fund; and

the security fund maintained under (1) of this subsection is maintained under the control of a person listed in AS

06.26.010(a)

.

A trust company may make periodic withdrawals from or additions to the security fund required by (a) of this section if the trust company maintains the value required by (a) of this section for the security fund. Income from the securities in the security fund belongs to the trust company.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, security under (a) of this section for a deposit is not required to the extent the deposit is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For investments, loans, deposits, and trust assets, see 3 AAC 4, art. 3.

Sec. 06.26.380.
Common investment funds.

Subject to regulations adopted by the department, a trust company may invest trust assets in common investment funds.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.390.
Fee determination; investment and management costs.

A trust company shall deal at arm’s length with a person when arranging the compensation to be paid by the person for the services of the trust company. Any compensation paid to the trust company must be a reasonable amount with respect to the services rendered.

When investing and managing trust assets, a trust company may only incur costs that are appropriate and reasonable in relation to the assets, the purposes of the trust, and the skills of the trust company.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For investments, loans, deposits, and trust assets, see 3 AAC 4, art. 3.

Sec. 06.26.400.
Disclosure of conflicts of interest.

Before accepting appointment as a trustee, a trust company shall disclose any conflict of interest that may reasonably be expected to arise in the relationship.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.410.
Requirements for handling trust assets.

A trust company, its representatives, and its appointees shall observe the requirements applicable to trustees under AS

13.36.225

—

13.36.290

(Alaska Uniform Prudent Investor Act).

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)